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DTC P0 171 SystemtooLean(Bank 1)

DTC P0 172SystemtooRich(Bank 1)

DTC P0 174SystemtooLean(Bank2)

DTC P0 175SystemtooRich(Bank2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The fuel trim is related to the feedback compensation value, not to the basic injection time. The fuel trim in-
cludes theshort −termfuel trimand the long −termfuel trim.
Theshort −termfuel trim is theshort −termfuelcompensationused tomaintain theair −fuel ratioatstoichio-
metricair −fuel ratio.Thesignal fromtheheatedoxygensensor indicateswhether theair −fuel ratio isRICH
orLEANcompared to thestoichiometricair −fuel ratio.Thisvariance triggersa reduction in the fuel volume
if theair −fuel ratio isRICH,andan increase in the fuel volume if it isLEAN.
The long −termfuel trim is theoverall fuel compensationcarriedout in long −termtocompensate foracontinu-
aldeviationof theshort −termfuel trim fromthecentral value,due to individualenginedifferences,wearover-
time and changes in the operating environment.
If both theshort −termfuel trimand the long −termfuel trimareLEANorRICHbeyondacertainvalue, it is
detected as a malfunction and the MIL is illuminated and a DTC is set.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0171
P0174

Whenair −fuel ratio feedback isstableafterwarmingupengine,
fuel trim is considerably in error on LEAN side
(2 trip detection logic)

SAir inductionsystem
S Injectorblockage
SMassair flowmeter
SEnginecoolant temperaturesensor
SFuelpressure

SGas leakage inexhaustsystem
SOpenorshort inheatedoxygensensor (bank 1,2sensor 1)
circuit

SHeatedoxygensensor (bank 1,2sensor 1)
SHeatedoxygensensorheater (bank 1,2sensor 1)
SEFIorECDrelay
SPCVpiping
SEnginecontrolECU

P0172
P0175

Whenair −fuel ratio feedback isstableafterwarmingupengine,
fuel trim is considerably in error on RICH side
(2 trip detection logic)

S Injector leak,blockage
SMassair flowmeter
SEnginecoolant temperaturesensor
S Ignitionsystem
SFuelpressure
SGas leakage inexhaustsystem
SOpenorshort inheatedoxygensensor (bank 1,2sensor 1)
circuit

SHeatedoxygensensor (bank 1,2sensor 1)
SEnginecontrolECU
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Fuel compensation
amount

1.40

1.0

0.65

+40 (%): Thershold at LEAN

−35 (%): Thershold at RICH
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HINT:
S When DTC P0171 or P0174 is recorded, the actual air−fuel ratio is on the LEAN side. When DTC

P0172 or P0175 is recorded, the actual air−fuel ratio is on the RICH side.
S If the vehicle runs out of fuel, the air−fuel ratio is LEAN and DTC P0171 or P0174 may be recorded.

The MIL then comes on.
S If the total of the short−term fuel trim value and long−term fuel trim value is within  35 % (engine cool-

ant temperature is more than 75 �C (167�F)), the system is functioning normally.

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

Under closed−loop fuel control, fuel injection amounts that deviate from the engine control ECU’s estimated
fuel amount will cause a change in the long−term fuel trim compensation value. This long−term fuel trim is
adjusted when there are persistent deviations in the short−term fuel trim values. And the deviation from a
simulated fuel injection amount by the engine control ECU affects a smoothed fuel trim learning value. The
smoothed fuel trim learning value is the combination of smoothed short term fuel trim (fuel feedback com-
pensation value) and smoothed long term fuel trim (learning value of the air−fuel ratio). When the smoothed
fuel trim learning value exceeds the DTC threshold, the engine control ECU interprets this as a fault in the
fuel system and sets a DTC.
Example:
If thesmoothed fuel trim learningvalue ismore than+40%or less than −35%theenginecontrolECUinter-
prets this as a malfunction in the fuel system.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI−35.
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More than 0.5 V

Less than 0.4 V
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Case3
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Outputvoltageofheatedoxygen
sensor (sensor 1: frontsensor)

Injection volume

Outputvoltage

Outputvoltageofheatedoxygen
sensor (sensor2: rearsensor)

Mainly suspect
trouble area

OK
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More than 0.5 V
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Injection volume

Outputvoltage
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Less than0.4V

Injection volume

Output voltage

Sensor 1: frontsensor
(sensor 1,heater, sensor 1
circuit)

+25 %
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More than 0.5 V

Less than 0.4 V

Injection volume

Output voltage
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Injection volume

Outputvoltage

NG
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NG
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NG

Extremely rich or lean of the
actualair −fuel ratio
(Injector, fuel pressure, gas
leakage in exhaust system,
etc.)

OK

OK

OK

Almost no reaction

�

Sensor 2: rear sensor
(sensor 2, heater, sensor 2
circuit)

Almost no reaction

Almostno reaction

Almostno reaction
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Hand−held testeronly:
The narrowing down the trouble area is possible by performing ACTIVE TEST of the following ”A/F CON-
TROL” (Heated oxygen sensor or another can be distinguished).
(a)PerformACTIVETESTbyhand −held tester (A/FCONTROL).
HINT:
”A/FCONTROL” is theACTIVETESTwhichchanges the injectionvolumeto −12.5%or+25%.

(1)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3on thevehicle.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Warm up the engine with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(4) Select the item ”DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL”.
(5) Perform ”A/F CONTROL” with the engine in an idle condition (press the right or left button).

RESULT:
Heated oxygen sensor reacts in accordance with increase and decrease of injection volume
+25% � richoutput:More than0.5V
−12.5% � leanoutput:Lessthan0.4V

NOTICE:
However, there isa fewsecondsdelay in thesensor 1 (frontsensor)output.Andthere isamaximum
20 seconds delay in the sensor 2 (rear sensor).
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The following A/F CONTROL procedure enables the technician to check and graph the voltage output of
theheatedoxygensensors (sensor 1 and2).
For displaying the graph indication, enter ”ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL / USER DATA” then select ”O2S
B1S1 andO2SB 1S2”bypressing ”YES”buttonandpush”ENTER”buttonbeforepressing ”F4”button.
HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewaswarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,etc.at
the time of the malfunction.

S Ahighheatedoxygensensor (sensor 1)voltage (0.5Vormore)couldbecausedbyarichair fuelmix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run rich.

S Alowheatedoxygensensor (sensor 1)voltage (0.4Vor less)couldbecausedbya leanair fuelmix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run lean.

1 Checkair inductionsystem(SeePub.No.RM630E,pageFI −1).

CHECK:
Check the air induction system for vacuum leaks.

NG Repair or replace air induction system.

OK

2 Check connection of PCV piping.

NG Repair or replace PCV piping.

OK

3Check injector injection(SeePub.No.RM630E,pageFI −24).

NG Replace injector.

OK
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4 Check air flow meter.

PREPARATION:
Remove the air flow meter.
CHECK:
(a) Inspect output voltage.

(1) Apply battery voltage across terminals +B and E2G.
(2) Connect the positive (+) tester prove to terminal VG,

and negative (−) tester prove to terminal E2G.
(3) Blow air into the mass air flow sensor, and check

that the voltage fluctuates.
(b) Inspect resistance.

(1) Measure the resistance between terminals of the in-
take air temperature sensor.

Resistance:

Tester Connection Temperature Specified Condition

−20_C (−4_F) 13.6 to 18.4 k�

THA (4) − E2 (5) 20_C (68_F) 2.21 to 2.69 k�THA (4) E2 (5)

60_C (140_F) 0.49 to 0.67 k�

NG Replace air flow meter.

OK
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5 Check engine coolant temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:
Remove the engine coolant temperature sensor.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between the terminals of the en-

gine coolant temperature sensor.
Resistance:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

1 2
2.32 to 2.59 k� (20_C (68_F))

1 − 2
0.310 to 0.326 k� (80_C (176_F))

NOTICE:
In case of checking the engine coolant temperature sensor
in the water, be careful not to allow water to go into the ter-
minals. After checking, dry the sensor.
HINT:
Alternate procedure: Connect an ohmmeter to the installed en-
gine coolant temperature sensor and read the resistance. Use
an infrared thermometer to measure the engine temperature in
the immediate vicinity of the sensor. Compare these values to
the resistance/temperature graph. Change the engine temper-
ature (warm up or allow to cool down) and repeat the test.
(b) Reinstall the engine coolant temperature sensor.

NG Repair or replace engine coolant temperature
sensor.

OK

6 Check for spark and ignition (See Pub. No. RM630E, page IG−1).

NG Repair or replace ignition system.

OK
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7 Check fuel pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI−1).

CHECK:
Check the fuel pressure (high or low pressure).

NG Check and replace fuel pump, pressure regula-
tor, fuel pipe line and filter (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−7).

OK

8 Check exhaust system for gas leakage.

NG Repair or replace exhaust gas leakage point.

OK



A21963

DI−118
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE

2UZ−FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

9 Check output voltage of heated oxygen sensor (bank 1, 2 sensor 1) during id-
ling.

PREPARATION:
(a) Warm up the heated oxygen sensor with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(b) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menu: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL

/ O2S B1 S1 or B2 S1.
CHECK:
Check the output voltage of the heated oxygen sensor during idling using the hand−held tester.
OK:

Heated oxygen sensor output voltage:
Alternates between less than 0.4 V and more than 0.55 V (See the following table).
.

OK Go to step 17.

NG
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10 Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor
connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen
sensor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

HT (H11−1) − +B (H11−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H12−1) − +B (H12−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H13−1) − +B (H13−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H14−1) − +B (H14−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

NG Replace heated oxygen sensor.

OK

11 Check EFI or ECD relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:
Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.
OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition

Usually 10 k� or higher

1 − 3 Apply B+ between
terminals 2 and 4

Below 1 �

NG Replace EFI or ECD relay.

OK
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12 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and heated oxygen sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen

sensor connector.
(b) Disconnect the E8 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

OX (H11−3) − OX1A (E8−23) Below 1 �

HT (H11−1) − HT1A (E8−4) Below 1 �

OX (H12−3) − OX1B (E8−29) Below 1 �

HT (H12−1) − HT1B (E8−5) Below 1 �

OX (H13−3) − OX2A (E8−22) Below 1 �

HT (H13−1) − HT2A (E8−33) Below 1 �

OX (H14−3) − OX2B (E8−21) Below 1 �

HT (H14−1) − HT2B (E8−25) Below 1 �

OX (H11−3) or OX1A (E8−23) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H11−1) or HT1A (E8−4) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H12−3) or OX1B (E8−29) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H12−1) or HT1B (E8−5) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H13−3) or OX2A (E8−22) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H13−1) or HT2A (E8−33) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H14−3) or OX2B (E8−21) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H14−1) or HT2B (E8−25) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher
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Reference (Bank 1 Sensor 1 System Drawing)

From
Battery EFI or ECD

No. 1 Fuse

EFI or ECD
Relay EFI or ECD

No. 2 Fuse

Heater Oxygen
Sensor

Heater

Sensor

HT1A

OX1A

E2

MREL

Engine Control ECU
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NG Replace or replace harness or connector.

OK

13 Replace heated oxygen sensor.

Go
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14 Perform confirmation driving pattern.

(a) Connect the Intelligent Tester II to the DLC3.
(b) Switch from normal mode to check mode.
(c) Warm up the engine until the Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) reaches to 75_C (167_F).
(d) Drive the vehicle at 31 mph (50 km/h) or more for 3 to 5 minutes.
(e) Allow the engine to idle for 2 minutes.
(f) Perform procedure (d) and (e) at least 3 times.
(g) Confirm that no DTC occurs.

GO

15 Is there DTC P0171, P0172, P0174 or P0175 being output again?

YES Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630, page FI−74) and perform confirmation
driving pattern (Refer to step 14).

NO
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16 Confirm if vehicle has run out of fuel in past.

NO Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−3) .

YES

DTC P0171, P0172, P0174 or P0175 is caused by running out of fuel.

17 Perform confirmation driving pattern.

HINT:
Clear all DTCs prior to performing the confirmation driving pattern (Refer to step 14).

Go

18 Is there DTC P0171, P0172 P0174 and/or P0175 being output again?

NO Go to step 22.

YES

19 Replace heated oxygen sensor.

Go

20 Perform confirmation driving pattern.

HINT:
Clear all DTCs prior to performing the confirmation driving pattern (Refer to step 14).

Go
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21 Is the DTC P0171, P0172, P0174 and/or P0175 being output again?

YES Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630, page FI−74) and perform confirmation
driving pattern (Refer to step 14).

No

22 Confirm if vehicle has run out of fuel in past.

NO Check for intermittent problems.
(See page DI−3) .

YES

DTC is caused by running out of fuel
(DTCs P0171, P0172 P0174 and/or P0175).


